Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.235

Slot machines, antique—Defenses concerning—Presumption created.

(1) For purposes of a prosecution under RCW 9.46.215 or a seizure, confiscation, or destruction order under RCW 9.46.231, it shall be a defense that the gambling device involved is an antique slot machine and that the antique slot machine was not operated for gambling purposes while in the owner's or defendant's possession. Operation of an antique slot machine shall be only by free play or with coins provided at no cost by the owner. No slot machine, having been seized under this chapter, may be altered, destroyed, or disposed of without affording the owner thereof an opportunity to present a defense under this section. If the defense is applicable, the antique slot machine shall be returned to the owner or defendant, as the court may direct.

(2) RCW 9.46.231 shall have no application to any antique slot machine that has not been operated for gambling purposes while in the owner's possession.

(3) For the purposes of this section, a slot machine shall be conclusively presumed to be an antique slot machine if it is at least twenty-five years old.

(4) RCW 9.46.231 and 9.46.215 do not apply to gambling devices on board a passenger cruise ship which has been registered and bonded with the federal maritime commission, if the gambling devices are not operated for gambling purposes within the state.

[ 1994 c 218 s 15; 1987 c 191 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 165 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 218: See note following RCW 9.46.010.